Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2710.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-47.2-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47.2 entitled "Unlawful
Sale of Prohibited Firearms [Effective July 1, 2026.]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47.2-2. Restrictions on manufacture, sale, and purchase of prohibited firearms.
Restrictions on manufacture, sale, possession, and purchase of prohibited firearms. [Effective
July 1, 2026.]
(a) No person shall manufacture, sell, offer to sell, transfer, possess, or purchase a
prohibited firearm, except as otherwise authorized under this section. Any person convicted of
violating this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than ten (10) years, or by
a fine up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and the prohibited firearm shall be subject to forfeiture.
(b) The following limited exceptions to subsection (a) of this section shall apply:
(1) A person who lawfully possesses a prohibited firearm prior to July 1, 2026, may sell,
offer to sell, or transfer their prohibited firearm to a federally licensed firearm dealer, or to an
individual outside the state who may lawfully possess such weapon by December 31, 2026.
(2) A federally licensed firearm dealer may sell, offer to sell, or transfer a prohibited
firearm to another federally licensed firearm dealer, or to a law enforcement entity identified in
subsection (b)(3) of this section, or to an individual outside the state who may lawfully possess
such weapon.
(3) A law enforcement agency, acting under authority of the United States, the state, or any

of its political subdivisions, to import or purchase a prohibited firearm and may lawfully sell, offer
to sell, or transfer a prohibited firearm to a federally licensed firearm dealer or to another law
enforcement agency, acting under authority of the United States or a state or any of its political
subdivisions.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005538
========
LC005538 - Page 2 of 3